Utah statutes.
9-4-1502.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Contaminated by methamphetamine" means that a residence is:
(a)  polluted by hazardous materials as a result of the use, production, or
presence of methamphetamine in excess of decontamination standards adopted by
the Department of Health under Section 26-51-201; and
(b)  placed on a contamination list by a local health department in accordance
with Section 19-6-903.
(2)  "Fund" means the Methamphetamine Housing Reconstruction and
Rehabilitation Fund created in Section 9-4-1503.
(3)  "Qualified housing organization" means an affiliate located in this state
of an organization if that organization:
(a)  is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3), Internal
Revenue Code;
(b)  operates on a worldwide basis;
(c)  has the primary purposes of:
(i)  constructing, reconstructing, and rehabilitating residences that are:
(A)  sold to low-income persons selected by the organization in accordance
with any rules the division makes as authorized by Section 9-4-1503; and
(B)  financed with loans that are not subject to interest as determined by the
organization in accordance with any rules the division makes as authorized by
Section 9-4-1503; and
(ii)  purchasing property upon which residences described in Subsection
(3)(c)(i) are constructed, reconstructed, or rehabilitated;
(d)  expends a portion of the repayment on the loans described in Subsection
(3)(c)(i)(B) to finance:
(i)  the construction, reconstruction, and rehabilitation of residences
described in Subsection (3)(c)(i); and
(ii)  the purchase of property upon which residences described in Subsection
(3)(c)(i) are constructed, reconstructed, or rehabilitated; and
(e)  has built more than 250,000 residences in total.
(4) (a)  "Residence" means a single-family residence.
(b)  "Residence" includes:
(i)  a condominium;
(ii)  a garage;
(iii)  real property appurtenant to a residence:
(A)  as determined by the division in accordance with any rules the division
makes as authorized by Section 9-4-1503; and
(B)  if that real property is contaminated by methamphetamine;
(iv)  a shed; or
(v)  a town home.
(c)  "Residence" does not include:
(i)  an apartment or other rental unit as determined by the division in
accordance with any rules the division makes as authorized by Section
9-4-1503; or
(ii)  an outbuilding except for a garage or shed.
